Nevada, session 83, AB364.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 388D.270 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388D.270 1. A scholarship organization must:
(a) Be exempt from taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).
(b) Not own or operate any school in this State, including,
without limitation, a private school, which receives any grant money
pursuant to the Nevada Educational Choice Scholarship Program.
(c) Accept donations from taxpayers and other persons and may
also solicit and accept gifts and grants.
(d) Not expend more than 5 percent of the total amount of
money accepted pursuant to paragraph (c) to pay its administrative
expenses.
(e) Provide grants on behalf of pupils who are members of a
household that has a household income which is not more than 300
percent of the federally designated level signifying poverty to allow
those pupils to attend schools in this State chosen by the parents or
legal guardians of those pupils, including, without limitation, private
schools. The total amount of a grant provided by the scholarship
organization on behalf of a pupil pursuant to this paragraph must not
exceed $7,755 for Fiscal Year 2015-2016.
(f) Not limit to a single school the schools for which it provides
grants.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (e) [,] and
subsection 6, not limit to specific pupils the grants provided
pursuant to [that] paragraph [.] (e).
2. The maximum amount of a grant provided by the
scholarship organization pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection 1
must be adjusted on July 1 of each year for the fiscal year beginning
that day and ending June 30 in a rounded dollar amount
-
*AB364*

– 3 –
corresponding to the percentage of increase in the Consumer Price
Index (All Items) published by the United States Department of
Labor for the preceding calendar year. On May 1 of each year, the
Department of Education shall determine the amount of increase
required by this subsection, establish the adjusted amounts to take
effect on July 1 of that year and notify each scholarship organization
of the adjusted amounts. The Department of Education shall also
post the adjusted amounts on its Internet website.
3. A grant provided on behalf of a pupil pursuant to subsection
1 must be paid directly to the school chosen by the parent or legal
guardian of the pupil.
4. A scholarship organization shall provide each taxpayer and
other person who makes a donation, gift or grant of money to the
scholarship organization pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1
with an affidavit, signed under penalty of perjury, which includes,
without limitation:
(a) A statement that the scholarship organization satisfies the
requirements set forth in subsection 1; and
(b) The total amount of the donation, gift or grant made to the
scholarship organization.
5. Each school in which a pupil is enrolled for whom a grant is
provided by a scholarship organization shall maintain a record of the
academic progress of the pupil. The record must be maintained in
such a manner that the information may be aggregated and reported
for all such pupils if reporting is required by the regulations of the
Department of Education.
6. A scholarship organization shall not use a donation for
which a taxpayer received a tax credit pursuant to NRS 363A.139
or 363B.119 to provide a grant pursuant to this section on behalf
of a pupil unless the scholarship organization used a donation for
which a taxpayer received a tax credit pursuant to NRS 363A.139
or 363B.119 to provide a grant pursuant to this section on behalf
of the pupil for the immediately preceding school year for the
same school. A scholarship organization that violates this
subjection shall repay to the Department of Taxation the amount
of the tax credit received by the taxpayer pursuant to NRS
363A.139 or 363B.119, as applicable.
7. If, pursuant to subsection 6, there ceases to be any pupil on
whose behalf a scholarship organization is authorized to provide a
grant, the scholarship organization shall notify the Department of
Taxation of that fact. If a scholarship organization has not, at that
time, expended all of the donations for which a taxpayer received
a tax credit pursuant to NRS 363A.139 or 363B.119, the
scholarship organization shall repay to the Department of
Taxation an amount of the tax credit received by taxpayers
-
*AB364*

– 4 –
pursuant to NRS 363A.139 or 363B.119 which is equal to the
amount of such donations that were not expended by the
scholarship organization.
8. The Department of Education:
(a) Shall adopt regulations prescribing the contents of and
procedures for applications for grants provided pursuant to
subsection 1.
(b) May adopt such other regulations as the Department
determines necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
[7.] 9. As used in this section, “private school” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 394.103.
Sec. 2. NRS 363A.139 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363A.139 1. Any taxpayer who is required to pay a tax
pursuant to NRS 363A.130 may receive a credit against the tax
otherwise due for any donation of money made by the taxpayer to a
scholarship organization in the manner provided by this section.
2. To receive the credit authorized by subsection 1, a taxpayer
who intends to make a donation of money to a scholarship
organization must, before making such a donation, notify the
scholarship organization of the taxpayer’s intent to make the
donation and to seek the credit authorized by subsection 1. A
scholarship organization shall, before accepting any such donation,
apply to the Department of Taxation for approval of the credit
authorized by subsection 1 for the donation. The Department of
Taxation shall, within 20 days after receiving the application,
approve or deny the application and provide to the scholarship
organization notice of the decision and, if the application is
approved, the amount of the credit authorized. Upon receipt of
notice that the application has been approved, the scholarship
organization shall provide notice of the approval to the taxpayer
who must, not later than 30 days after receiving the notice, make the
donation of money to the scholarship organization. If the taxpayer
does not make the donation of money to the scholarship
organization within 30 days after receiving the notice, the
scholarship organization shall provide notice of the failure to the
Department of Taxation and the taxpayer forfeits any claim to
the credit authorized by subsection 1.
3. The Department of Taxation shall approve or deny
applications for the credit authorized by subsection 1 in the order in
which the applications are received. The Department of Taxation
shall not approve an application for the credit authorized by
subsection 1 made by a scholarship organization which has
provided or is required to provide the notice described in
subsection 7 of NRS 388D.270.
-
*AB364*

– 5 –
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the
Department of Taxation may, for each fiscal year, approve
applications for the credit authorized by subsection 1 until the total
amount of the credits authorized by subsection 1 and approved by
the Department of Taxation pursuant to this subsection and
subsection 4 of NRS 363B.119 is $6,655,000. The amount of any
credit which is forfeited pursuant to subsection 2 must not be
considered in calculating the amount of credits authorized for any
fiscal year.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, in addition
to the amount of credits authorized by subsection 4 for Fiscal Years
2019-2020, 2020-2021 and 2021-2022, the Department of Taxation
may approve applications for the credit authorized by subsection 1
for each of those fiscal years until the total amount of the credits
authorized by subsection 1 and approved by the Department of
Taxation pursuant to this subsection and subsection 5 of NRS
363B.119 is $4,745,000. The provisions of subsection 4 do not
apply to the amount of credits authorized by this subsection and the
amount of credits authorized by this subsection must not be
considered when determining the amount of credits authorized for a
fiscal year pursuant to subsection 4. If, in Fiscal Year 2019-2020,
2020-2021 or 2021-2022, the amount of credits authorized by
subsection 1 and approved pursuant to this subsection and
subsection 5 of NRS 363B.119 is less than $4,745,000, the
remaining amount of credits pursuant to this subsection and
subsection 5 of NRS 363B.119 must be carried forward and made
available for approval during subsequent fiscal years until the total
amount of credits authorized by subsection 1 and approved pursuant
to this subsection and subsection 5 of NRS 363B.119 is equal to
$14,235,000. The amount of any credit which is forfeited pursuant
to subsection 2 must not be considered in calculating the amount of
credits authorized pursuant to this subsection.
6. If a taxpayer applies to and is approved by the Department
of Taxation for the credit authorized by subsection 1, the amount of
the credit provided by this section is equal to the amount approved
by the Department of Taxation pursuant to subsection 2, which must
not exceed the amount of the donation made by the taxpayer to a
scholarship organization. The total amount of the credit applied
against the taxes described in subsection 1 and otherwise due from a
taxpayer must not exceed the amount of the donation.
7. If the amount of the tax described in subsection 1 and
otherwise due from a taxpayer is less than the credit to which the
taxpayer is entitled pursuant to this section, the taxpayer may, after
applying the credit to the extent of the tax otherwise due, carry the
balance of the credit forward for not more than 5 years after the end
-
*AB364*

– 6 –
of the calendar year in which the donation is made or until the
balance of the credit is applied, whichever is earlier.
8. As used in this section, “scholarship organization” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 388D.260.
Sec. 3. NRS 363B.119 is hereby amended to read as follows:
363B.119 1. Any taxpayer who is required to pay a tax
pursuant to NRS 363B.110 may receive a credit against the tax
otherwise due for any donation of money made by the taxpayer to a
scholarship organization in the manner provided by this section.
2. To receive the credit authorized by subsection 1, a taxpayer
who intends to make a donation of money to a scholarship
organization must, before making such a donation, notify the
scholarship organization of the taxpayer’s intent to make the
donation and to seek the credit authorized by subsection 1. A
scholarship organization shall, before accepting any such donation,
apply to the Department of Taxation for approval of the credit
authorized by subsection 1 for the donation. The Department of
Taxation shall, within 20 days after receiving the application,
approve or deny the application and provide to the scholarship
organization notice of the decision and, if the application is
approved, the amount of the credit authorized. Upon receipt of
notice that the application has been approved, the scholarship
organization shall provide notice of the approval to the taxpayer
who must, not later than 30 days after receiving the notice, make the
donation of money to the scholarship organization. If the taxpayer
does not make the donation of money to the scholarship
organization within 30 days after receiving the notice, the
scholarship organization shall provide notice of the failure to the
Department of Taxation and the taxpayer forfeits any claim to
the credit authorized by subsection 1.
3. The Department of Taxation shall approve or deny
applications for the credit authorized by subsection 1 in the order in
which the applications are received. The Department of Taxation
shall not approve an application for the credit authorized by
subsection 1 made by a scholarship organization which has
provided or is required to provide the notice described in
subsection 7 of NRS 388D.270.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the
Department of Taxation may, for each fiscal year, approve
applications for the credit authorized by subsection 1 until the total
amount of the credits authorized by subsection 1 and approved by
the Department of Taxation pursuant to this subsection and
subsection 4 of NRS 363A.139 is $6,655,000. The amount of any
credit which is forfeited pursuant to subsection 2 must not be
-
*AB364*

– 7 –
considered in calculating the amount of credits authorized for any
fiscal year.
5. In addition to the amount of credits authorized by subsection
4 for Fiscal Years 2019-2020, 2020-2021 and 2021-2022, the
Department of Taxation may approve applications for the credit
authorized by subsection 1 for each of those fiscal years until the
total amount of the credits authorized by subsection 1 and approved
by the Department of Taxation pursuant to this subsection and
subsection 5 of NRS 363A.139 is $4,745,000. The provisions
of subsection 4 do not apply to the amount of credits authorized by
this subsection and the amount of credits authorized by this
subsection must not be considered when determining the amount of
credits authorized for a fiscal year pursuant to subsection 4. If, in
Fiscal Year 2019-2020, 2020-2021 or 2021-2022, the amount of
credits authorized by subsection 1 and approved pursuant to this
subsection and subsection 5 of NRS 363A.139 is less than
$4,745,000, the remaining amount of credits pursuant to this
subsection and subsection 5 of NRS 363A.139 must be carried
forward and made available for approval during subsequent fiscal
years until the total amount of credits authorized by subsection 1
and approved pursuant to this subsection and subsection 5 of NRS
363A.139 is equal to $14,235,000. The amount of any credit which
is forfeited pursuant to subsection 2 must not be considered in
calculating the amount of credits authorized pursuant to this
subsection.
6. If a taxpayer applies to and is approved by the Department
of Taxation for the credit authorized by subsection 1, the amount of
the credit provided by this section is equal to the amount approved
by the Department of Taxation pursuant to subsection 2, which must
not exceed the amount of the donation made by the taxpayer to a
scholarship organization. The total amount of the credit applied
against the taxes described in subsection 1 and otherwise due from a
taxpayer must not exceed the amount of the donation.
7. If the amount of the tax described in subsection 1 and
otherwise due from a taxpayer is less than the credit to which the
taxpayer is entitled pursuant to this section, the taxpayer may, after
applying the credit to the extent of the tax otherwise due, carry the
balance of the credit forward for not more than 5 years after the end
of the calendar year in which the donation is made or until the
balance of the credit is applied, whichever is earlier.
8. As used in this section, “scholarship organization” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 388D.260.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB364*